src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!  ---------------

LEXICON BIMII
          +V+IV+Inf:%>ми{ː%} # ;
  +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1:сим      # ;
  +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2:синни    # ;
  +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3:син      # ;
  +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1:сив      # ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl12:сип      # ;
  +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1:сис      # ;
  +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1:си       # ;

LEXICON EMII
          +V+Neg+Inf:%>ми{ː%}            #           ;
  +V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg1:сим                 #           ;
  +V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg2:синни               #           ;
  +V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3:син                 #           ;
  +V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl1:сивун               #           ;
 +V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl12:сип                 #           ;
  +V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl1:сис                 #           ;
  +V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl1:си                  #           ;

      +V+Neg+Ind+Prt:%>ч%{A%}%{ː%}       PERS_B      ;
 +V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Iter:%>ӈки               PERS_B      ;

     +V+Neg+Ind+Fut1:%>д%{Я%}ӈ%{A%}%{ː%} PERS_B      ;
     +V+Neg+Ind+Fut2:%>д%{Я%}ли          PERS_A_SG12 ;
     +V+Neg+Ind+Fut2:%>д%{Я%}лл%{A%}     PERS_A_REST ;
     +V+Neg+Ind+Fut3:%>д%{Я%}%{ː%}       PERS_B      ;



LEXICON V_MOD
 +V+Inf:%>ми%{ː%} #         ;
     +V:          ACCIDENTS ;


LEXICON V_IV
 +V+IV+Inf:%>ми%{ː%} #         ;
     +V+IV:          ACCIDENTS ;

LEXICON V_TV
 +V+TV+Inf:%>ми%{ː%} #         ;
     +V+TV:          ACCIDENTS ;

LEXICON ACCIDENTS

          +Ind+Prs:%{U%}               PERS_A_SG12 ;
          +Ind+Prs:%>%{R%}%{A%}        PERS_A_REST ;
          +Ind+Prt:%>ч%{A%}%{ː%}       PERS_B      ;
     +Ind+Prt+Iter:%>ӈки               PERS_B      ;
      +Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>ч%{A%}%{ː%}хун    #           ;
 +Ind+Prt+Iter+Pl2:%>ӈкихун            #           ;
         +Ind+Fut1:%>д%{Я%}ӈ%{A%}%{ː%} PERS_B      ;
         +Ind+Fut2:%>д%{Я%}ли          PERS_A_SG12 ;
         +Ind+Fut2:%>д%{Я%}лл%{A%}     PERS_A_REST ;
         +Ind+Fut3:%>д%{Я%}%{ː%}       PERS_B      ;
       +Ind+ConNeg:%>%{R%}%{A%}        #           ;
              +Imp:                    PERSIMP_A   ;
              +Imp:                    PERSIMP_B   ;

LEXICON PERSIMP_A
  +Sg1:%>кт%{A%}   # ;
  +Sg2:%>к%{A%}л   # ;
  +Sg3:%>гин       # ;
  +Pl1:%>квун      # ;
 +Pl12:%>г%{A%}т   # ;
  +Pl2:%>к%{A%}ллу # ;
  +Pl3:%>ктын      # ;


LEXICON PERSIMP_B
  +Sg1:%>ӈн%{A%}м     # ;
  +Sg2:%>д%{A%}ви     # ;
  +Sg3:%>ӈн%{A%}н     # ;
  +Pl1:%>ӈн%{A%}вун   # ;
 +Pl12:%>ӈн%{A%}т     # ;
  +Pl2:%>д%{A%}в%{A%} # ;
  +Pl3:%>ӈн%{A%}тын   # ;


LEXICON PERS_A_SG12

 +Sg1:%>м   # ; ! %> in previous lexicon
 +Sg2:%>нни # ;

LEXICON PERS_A_REST
  +Sg3:%>н # ;

  +Pl1:%>в # ;
 +Pl12:%>п # ;
  +Pl2:%>с # ;
  +Pl3:    # ;

LEXICON PERS_B

  +Sg1:%>в   # ;
  +Sg2:%>с   # ;
  +Sg3:%>н   # ;

  +Pl1:%>вун # ;
 +Pl12:%>т   # ;
  +Pl2:%>сун # ;
  +Pl3:%>тын # ;
